Hawaii, session 2026, GM1149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 323D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
""Health care" means the improvement of a person's health
through the prevention, diagnosis, treatment, and amelioration
or cure of disease, illness, injury, or other physical and
mental impairment, regardless of the setting in which those
services are delivered. "Health care" includes oral health,
behavioral health, and long-term care."
SECTION 2. Section 323D-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§323D-12 Health planning and development functions; state
agency. (a) The state agency shall:
(1) Have as a principal function the responsibility for
promoting [acceooibili-ty for all the -pooplc of the
S4:at-e- fee--guali^y health care aGrviccs--Qt roasenable
eo-st.-- The otafee- ageney- shall- conduct ouch studies and
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO
iMniiinmiiiinioiiiiiii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
invcotigationa aa may -be nccGssary as- to the Gausca of
■hoalth caro ooets- incl-tiding inflation.-- Tho otato
•ageney-^ftay—eefttH?aetr—fei^-ae^^viees-^te—iffipieifteftt—thire
paragraph.-- Tho cortificatG of need program mandatod
andGr part V shall oorvo this- function.-- The -s-tatc
agency—ahall promote the sharing ef—facilities ar
sorviccs by health care providers whenever possible to
achieve- economics and shall restrict -unusual -ar
unuouaH-y costly services to—individual facilritics or
providers where appropriate;
<3-)- Serve as staff to and provide--technical assistance and
advice to the statewide counci-1—and the subarea
councils- in the- preparation,—reviewT—and revision of
the-statc health sorvieos and fa-cilit-±ee- plan-;
-<34- Conduct the health planning activities of the--State in
coordination with tho subarea -eouncilo,—implement the
state health sorviees and facilities plan,—and
determine the statewide health- needs -of the State
after consulting with the statewide oeu-neil;—and]
universal access to high-quality, equitable, and
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO 2
lUlllllllinillHHIIIIII

Page 3 H.B. NO. E?
C.D. 1
affordable health care for all the people of the State
and a shared vision of the State's health care future;
(2) Conduct the health planning activities of the State in
collaboration with state agencies and with private
health care sector participants to assess and address
gaps or concerns affecting access, quality, and cost/
including but not limited to administrative
simplification and health information technology,
including artificial intelligence;
[-H-h] (3) Administer the state certificate of need program
pursuant to part V[—], and serve as staff and provide
technical assistance and advice to the statewide
council and subarea councils; and
(4) Establish a state health services and facilities plan
and update that plan at least every four years
following consultation with the statewide council.
(b) The state agency may:
(1) Prepare [-s^ueh] reports and recommendations on
the State's health care costs and public or
private efforts to reduce or control costs and health
care quality as it deems necessary. The [report]
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO
■iiiiiiiiiiiimiiiiiMii

Page 4 H.B. NO. ""2
C.D. 1
reports may include[7—but not 43g limited to,] a review
of health insurance plans[—]£ the availability of
various kinds of health insurance and malpractice
insurance to consumers[—]; data-supported analysis and
evaluation of the status of statewide and county
health care services accessibility, adequacy,
affordability, efficiency, equity, and quality,
including comparisons to national and other state
jurisdictions; and strategies for increasing
competition in the health insurance field[—] and
a^ross tl7e 22^aTyi carje dieliyery syst^n^
Prepare and rcv-i-se as nccGOGa3?y-'the abate health
oervicco and facilitioa plan.
4^ Prepare,—review,—and rovioc the annual implementation
plan.
-H-)-] (2) Assist the statewide council in the performance
of its functions[—]£
[4^1 (3) Determine the need for new health services
proposed to be offered within the State [—]2_
[4-6) ] (4) Assess existing health care services and
facilities to determine whether there are redundant,
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO
HIHIIHIIIillilllllllll

II K I
H.B. NO. 2319
H°2
O.U. 1
C.D. 1
excessive, or inappropriate services or facilities and
make public findings of any that are found to be so.
The state agency shall weigh the costs of the health
care services or facilities against the benefits the
services or facilities provide and there shall be a
negative presumption against marginal services[—]£
[-(-7-)-] (5) Provide technical assistance to persons, public
or private, in obtaining and filling out the necessary
forms for the development of projects and programs [—j^.
[4-8-)-] JAL Prepare reports, studies, and recommendations on
emerging health issues, such as medical ethics, health
care rationing, involuntary care, care for the
indigent, and standards for research and development
of biotechnology [aftd]^ genetic engineering[—]^
telehealth, artificial intelligence, and workforce
development; and
[4-9-)-] JAL Conduct [such] other activities as are necessary
to meet the purposes of this chapter."
SECTION 3. Section 323D-54, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO 5
iMiniiMiininiiniiii

H.B. NO. SS’2
C.D. 1
"§323D-54 Exemptions from certificate of need
requirements. Nothing in this part or rules with respect to the
requirement for certificates of need applies to:
(1) Offices of physicians, dentists, or other
practitioners of the healing arts in private practice
as distinguished from organized ambulatory health care
facilities, except in any case of purchase or
acquisition of equipment attendant to the delivery of
health care service and the instruction or supervision
for any private office or clinic involving a total
expenditure in excess of the expenditure minimum;
(2) Laboratories, [as dofinod in] regulated pursuant to
section 321-11(12), except in any case of purchase or
acquisition of equipment attendant to the delivery of
health care service and the instruction or supervision
for any laboratory involving a total expenditure in
excess of the expenditure minimum;
(3) Dispensaries and first aid stations located within
business or industrial establishments and maintained
solely for the use of employees; provided such
facilities do not regularly provide inpatient or
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO
Hiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiim

Page 7
H.B. NO.
■. . I 'I . g
C.D. 1
resident beds for patients or employees on a daily
twenty-four-hour basis;
(4) Dispensaries or infirmaries in correctional or
educational facilities;
(5) Dwelling establishments, such as hotels, motels, and
rooming or boarding houses that do not regularly
provide health care facilities or health care
services;
(6) Any home or institution conducted only for those who,
pursuant to the teachings, faith, or belief of any
group, depend for healing upon prayer or other
spiritual means;
(7) Dental clinics;
(8) Nonpatient areas of care facilities2_ such as parking
garages and administrative offices;
(9) Bed changes that involve [ten-] up to thirty per cent
[or ten—beds of existing liccnocd bed types,—whi-ehevcr
is less,] of a facility's total existing licensed beds
within a two-year period;
(10) Projects that are wholly dedicated to meeting the
State's obligations under court orders, including
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO 7
■inilHHHHii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
consent decrees, that have already determined that
need for the projects exists;
(11) Replacement of existing equipment with its modern-day
equivalent;
(12) Primary care clinics under the expenditure thresholds
referenced in section 323D-2;
(13) Equipment and services related to that equipment, that
are primarily invented and used for research purposes
as opposed to usual and customary diagnostic and
therapeutic care;
(14) Capital expenditures that are required:
(A) To eliminate or prevent imminent safety hazards
as defined by federal, state, or county fire,
building, or life safety codes or regulations;
(B) To comply with state licensure standards;
(C) To comply with accreditation standards,
compliance with which is required to receive
reimbursements under Title XVIII of the Social
Security Act or payments under a state plan for
medical assistance approved under Title XIX of
such Act;
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO 8
■niiniiiiiiffliiiuiii

Page 9 2319
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(15) Extended care adult residential care homes and
assisted living facilities;
(16) Health care facilities or services operated by the
department of health; or
(17) Other facilities or services that the agency
through the statewide council chooses to exempt, by
rules pursuant to section 323D-62."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3419 HB2319 CDl HMSO 9
INliiiBiHlllllilNin

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2319, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2319, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAFI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
100-26